North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 24. Juvenile Services. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-289.1 through 7A-289.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 1(a).

Cross References.

For the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-100

et seq.

§ 7A-289.7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 815, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present provisions relating to intake services in juvenile cases, see now

G.S. 7B-1700

.

§§ 7A-289.8 through 7A-289.12.

Reserved for future codification purposes.